District of Columbia statutes.
2-1207.06

Repealed

Powers of Corporation.

Repealed.

June 29, 1984, D.C. Law 5-89, § 7, 31 DCR 2514
Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-236, § 5(c), 42 DCR 33
Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-213, § 7, 49 DCR 8140
1981 Ed., § 1-2216.

Expiration of Law 10-236

Section 6(b) of D.C. Law 10-236 provided that the act shall expire 3 years after having taken effect. D.C. Law 10-236, which had inserted paragraph (21A), became effective on March 21, 1995.